src/phonology/otw-phon.xfscript
define ambigsync [vowel -> %' || !syncope in ortho ambig contexts
                                \[.#.|%-] n _  [z|g|h|s|y], !material preceding n reflects a permitted ambiguity
                                                            !for derived nh, ' not always used (mzinhigan perhaps preceding V must be long?)
                                [s|z] _  [h]
                                ];

define clustsync [vowel -> %' || !crazy version (marking all prim/sec ambig clusts)
                                n _  [d|z h|z|j|g|h|s|y],
                                m _  [b],
                                [s|z] _  [h],
                                [s (h)] _  [p|t|k],
                                cons-[w|y|w1|w2|w3|w4|y1|%'|h] _  w
                                ];

define rsync [vowel -> 0 || _ \%& ]; 

!define codawdel [w (->) 0 || _ cons ]; !w variably deletes in coda Medler MOVE TO ERROR MODEL
                                        !alternatively: the deleting w (VAI 3 suff) is irregularly present
define strandedNas [n -> 0 || [.#.|%-] n  _ [g|d|j|z] ]; !limiting this to just the consonantal cluster members (g|d|j|z(h)), since that is definitely where it is needed, but maybe nnw clusters also get written nw?
!define strandedNas [[n|m] (->) 0 || cons  _ cons ]; 

define cleanse [ [%>|%^|%<|%&|%*] -> 0 ]; !> = suff bound, < pre bound, ^ v-init dep stem marker, & stress marker, *extended prefix boundary


read regex [ 
    L1del        .o.
    rmspecialv    .o. !special char killer
    preGli      .o. !This is a bloomfield rule ... very useful for getting wiij... words, etc (these are prominent in AW stories)
    !optinitV    .o. !ORIGINAL TREATMENT TO ALLOW post syncope n-nokii < n[d]-ankii < nidanokii. CURRENT TREATMENT IS TO USE SHORTENED PREFIXES WITH +Nul TAG (ALLOWS FOR EASIER IDENTIFICATION, BECAUSE IT IS NOT SILENT, BUT IT DOES CREATE (USUALLY STARK) OVERGENERATION ON ORIGINAL CVC WORDS) LEAVE COMMENTED OUT
    preDel      .o.
    preLen      .o.
    !preNas      .o. !non-syncopating dialects have excrescent nasals that show up after ni- '1'. comment out in syncope versions
    preEpen     .o. 
    conDimMutation .o.
    conPl       .o.
    a1toshort   .o.
    a1toe       .o.
    a1tolong    .o.
    i1tolong    .o.
    ordAssim    .o.
    NC          .o.
    cnjD1Gnasstem .o.
    partexcise  .o.
    cnjD1p      .o.
    cnjpb1      .o.
    cnjnegsig   .o.
    cnjd1w4     .o.
    cnjo        .o.
    cnjW3w      .o.
    cnjW3del    .o.
    cnjrmbound  .o.
    cnjaepen    .o.
    w5o         .o.
    w5del       .o.
    w5w         .o.
    noomagad    .o.
    vLenmagad   .o.
    mgAssim     .o.
    n2y1del     .o.
    ccEpen      .o.
    awiCoalescence .o. !this is fed by ccEpen
    rmBound     .o. !rules at or above this line reference morpheme boundaries
    c2o         .o. !imperative rules (at least for vai)
    c2a         .o.
    rmc2        .o.
    cfill       .o. !reduplication rules
    fortite     .o.
    vfill       .o.
    ccnjexcrspec .o.
    n5Del       .o.
    ccnjlong    .o.
    ccnjshort   .o.
    rmccnj      .o.
    cnjHiatus   .o.
    cnjVoi      .o.
    d2k         .o.
    d2d2fuse    .o.
    d2del       .o.
    d2d         .o.
    cnjRmC1     .o.
    cnjD1Gnas   .o.
    d1pal       .o.
    cnjD1d      .o.
    !cnjW4nas    .o. !Medler didn't have this rule
    dubw4Del    .o.
    i3toi       .o.
    cnjW4w      .o.
    cnjw4Del    .o.
    cnjb1b      .o.
    vtiVoi      .o.
    complen     .o.
    m2pseudoV   .o.
    m2Del       .o.
    m2Assim     .o.
    w6Coal      .o.
    w6ToW       .o.
    m1n         .o.
    n4n         .o.
    m1m         .o.
    w2nas       .o.
    w2def       .o.
    NSpal        .o.
    Salv        .o.
    i2def     .o.
    Nalv        .o.
    ny          .o.
    vvvDel      .o.
    y1Coal      .o.
    w1Coal      .o.
    w1Coal2      .o.
    !w1Faith     .o.
    w1Short       .o.
    w1Del       .o.
    !wiCoal      .o. !Might should include this rule (Medler, might be more general)
    vCoal       .o.
    weirdStr    .o.
    delo3       .o.
    o3o         .o.
    lenPreNas   .o.
    Ei          .o.
    apocope     .o.
    iEpen       .o.
    hw2w        .o. !historical behavior would have glidedel bleed hw2w, but there are clear innovations that motivate making hw2w be counterbled by glidedel
    glidedel    .o.
    y2y         .o.
    n2del       .o.
    n2def       .o.
    str1        .o.
    str2        .o.
    str3        .o.
    ambigsync   .o. !comment out for non-syncopated
    rsync       .o. !comment out for non-syncopated
    !codawdel    .o. !Medler, probably more general
    strandedNas .o. !ngoji (not nngoji), etc
    cleanse     
    ]; 
save stack phonology.hfst
